Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.66.010

Alcoholism—Standards for institutions.

In addition to regulating the use of alcoholic beverages, a code city may exercise the powers relating to prescribing standards for institutions for treating alcoholism as authorized by RCW 71.12.550.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.66.010.]